Alabama, session 2026rs, HB376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) INSTRUCTIONAL TECHNOLOGY. Technology that a student
uses in connection to curriculum and instructional
experiences. The term includes technology such as electronic
devices, digital tools, and digital applications.
(2) PARENT. The same meaning as defined in Section
16-6F-4, Code of Alabama 1975.
(3) PUBLIC SCHOOL. The same meaning as defined in
Section 16-46B-1, Code of Alabama 1975.
(4) SCREEN TIME. Time spent by a student using an
electronic device with a screen in a classroom setting. The
term does not include when the use of the electronic device
involves direct instruction, guidance, or interaction with a
teacher, instructor, or other designated educational
Page 2

teacher, instructor, or other designated educational
HB376 INTRODUCED
personnel, or instruction for an online student.
(b)(1) Instructional technology used in public schools:
a. May not be unreasonably used as a substitute for
direct, teacher-led instruction;
b. Must be designed specifically for instructional use;
c. Must be absent of design features that interfere
with learning or distract from instruction;
d. Must be effective in supporting student learning
outcomes;
e. Must be safe for students' physical, cognitive, and
emotional development;
f. Must be supported by evidence or demonstrated
educational value appropriate for the grade level;
g. Must be intentionally integrated to enhance learning
outcomes; and
h. Must be compliant with applicable state standards
and laws, including privacy and data protection regulations.
(2) Local boards of education shall select, deploy, and
monitor instructional technology in accordance with the
requirements of this subsection, and shall adopt internal
monitoring policies and conduct training for faculty and
staff, as necessary, to ensure compliance with this section.
(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt a method
for evaluating and measuring the effectiveness of the
requirements for instructional technology described in
subdivision (b)(1).
(4) Upon request, local boards of education shall
provide parents of an enrolled student with any of the
Page 3

provide parents of an enrolled student with any of the
HB376 INTRODUCED
following:
a. Access to a list of all instructional technology
used in the student's classroom.
b. Access to the student's school-issued electronic
device, account credentials, and browsing history, if
applicable.
(c)(1) Before the 2027-2028 school year, the State
Board of Education shall develop a model policy on balanced
instructional technology use in the classroom to be adopted by
each local board of education. The model policy shall
accomplish all of the following:
a. Provide age-appropriate screen time limits and
Internet access limits for each grade level.
b. Require transparency with parents regarding the use
of instructional technology.
100 c. Prohibit instructional technology practices that
101 compromise student safety, privacy, or well-being.
102 d. Require regular review of instructional technology
103 to ensure compliance with established standards pursuant to
104 subsection (b).
105 e. Promote educators' modeling of appropriate and
106 responsible technology use.
107 f. Emphasize best practices for screen time in public
108 schools.
109 (2) The State Board of Education shall publish the
110 model policy on the website of the board.
111 (d) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules, as
112 necessary, to provide for the implementation of this section.
Page 4

necessary, to provide for the implementation of this section.
HB376 INTRODUCED
113 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
114 1, 2026.
Page 5